de: Shapewear-Verbesserungsfunktion: Reibungsschutz; Anti-Roll-Bund; Po-Lifting; Hüftpolsterung; Auslaufsicheres Futter; Postnatale Unterstützung; Oberschenkelstraffung; Bauchkontrolle; Taillenformung; Sonstige
sl-SI: Funkcija oblikovanja postave: Preprečevanje drgnjenja; Pas, ki se ne viha; Dviganje zadnjice; Oblazinjenje bokov; Neprepustna podloga; Poporodna podpora; Oblikovanje stegen; Oblikovanje trebuha; Ožanje pasu; Drugo
vi: Tính năng nâng cao của đồ định hình vóc dáng: Chống trầy xước; Cạp chống cuộn; Nâng mông; Đệm hông; Lớp lót chống tràn; Hỗ trợ sau sinh; Làm thon đùi; Kiểm soát vòng hai; Siết eo; Khác
fi: Muotoilevan alusvaatteen toiminnallinen ominaisuus: Hiertymistä estävä; Rullautumaton vyötärönauha; Pakaroita kohottava; Lantiotoppaus; Vuotamaton vuori; Synnytyksen jälkeinen tuki; Reisiä hoikentava; Vatsaa tukeva; Vyötäröä kaventava; Muu
ja: シェイプウェア補整機能: 股擦れ防止; ウエストバンドめくれ防止; ヒップアップ; ヒップパッド; 漏れ防止ライニング; 産後サポート; 太もも引き締め; お腹引き締め; ウエスト引き締め; その他
pt-BR: Modelador recurso de melhoria: Antiatrito; Cós que não enrola; Levanta bumbum; Enchimento de quadril; Forro à prova de vazamentos; Suporte pós-parto; Redução de coxas; Controle de abdômen; Afinamento de cintura; Outro
ko: 보정속옷 보정 기능: 쓸림 방지; 말림 방지 허리 밴드; 힙업; 힙 패딩; 샘 방지 안감; 산후 보정; 허벅지 슬리밍; 복부 보정; 허리 조임; 기타
zh-CN: 塑身衣功能强化特性: 防摩擦; 防卷边腰带; 提臀; 丰胯垫; 防漏内衬; 产后托腹; 瘦大腿; 收腹; 束腰; 其他
lt-LT: Formuojančio apatinio trikotažo papildoma funkcija: Apsauga nuo trinties; Nesusisukantis juosmuo; Sėdmenų pakėlimas; Klubų paminkštinimas; Nepralaidus pamušalas; Pagalba po gimdymo; Šlaunų liekninimas; Pilvo kontrolė; Juosmens suveržimas; Kita
hr-HR: Funkcija poboljšanja oblikovanja tijela: Protiv trenja; Pojas protiv rolanja; Podizanje stražnjice; Jastučići za bokove; Nepropusna podstava; Potpora nakon poroda; Stanjivanje bedara; Kontrola trbuha; Sužavanje struka; Drugo
th: คุณสมบัติเสริมของชุดกระชับสัดส่วน: กันการเสียดสี; ขอบเอวกันม้วน; ยกกระชับสะโพก; เสริมสะโพก; ซับในกันซึมเปื้อน; กระชับสัดส่วนหลังคลอด; กระชับต้นขา; กระชับหน้าท้อง; กระชับเอว; อื่นๆ
da: Forbedringsfunktion i shapewear: Modvirker gnavesår; Linning, der ikke ruller; Numseløft; Hoftepolstring; Lækagesikker foring; Støtte efter fødslen; Lårslankende; Mavekontrol; Taljeindsnævrende; Andet
pl: Funkcja wysmuklająca bielizny modelującej: Ochrona przed otarciami; Niezwijający się pas; Podnoszenie pośladków; Wypełnienie na biodrach; Podszewka zapobiegająca przeciekaniu; Wsparcie poporodowe; Wyszczuplanie ud; Kontrola brzucha; Ściąganie w talii; Inne
hu: Alakformáló ruházat funkcionális kiemelési jellemzője: Kidörzsölődésgátló; Legördülésgátló derékpánt; Fenékemelő; Csípőpárnázás; Szivárgásmentes bélés; Szülés utáni támasz; Combkarcsúsító; Haskontroll; Derékkarcsúsító; Egyéb
el: Χαρακτηριστικό βελτίωσης shapewear: Κατά της τριβής; Ζώνη μέσης που δεν διπλώνει; Ανόρθωση γλουτών; Ενίσχυση γοφών; Επένδυση κατά των διαρροών; Υποστήριξη λοχείας; Σύσφιξη μηρών; Έλεγχος κοιλιάς; Σμίλευση μέσης; Άλλο
es: Función de realce de fajas: Antifricción; Cintura antienrollamiento; Levantamiento de glúteos; Relleno para cadera; Forro a prueba de filtraciones; Soporte posparto; Moldeador de muslos; Control de abdomen; Ceñidor de cintura; Otro
cs: Funkce vylepšení stahovacího prádla: Proti oděru; Zpevněný pas proti rolování; Push-up efekt pro hýždě; Vycpávky boků; Nepropustná podšívka; Poporodní podpora; Zeštíhlení stehen; Stáhnutí břicha; Tvarování pasu; Jiné
sk-SK: Funkcia na vylepšenie tvarujúcej bielizne: Proti odieraniu; Nezhŕňajúci sa pás; Nadvihnutie zadku; Výplň na bokoch; Nepriepustná podšívka; Popôrodná opora; Zoštíhlenie stehien; Formovanie bruška; Stiahnutie pása; Iné
ro-RO: Caracteristica de modelare a lenjeriei corective: Anti-frecare; Talie anti-răsucire; Efect de lifting fese; Căptușeală șolduri; Căptușeală impermeabilă; Suport post-partum; Subțierea coapselor; Control abdominal; Modelarea taliei; Altele
bg-BG: Функция за подобряване на оформящото бельо: Против протриване; Колан против навиване; Повдигане на дупето; Подплънки на ханша; Непропусклива подплата; Следродилна подкрепа; Оформяне на бедрата; Прибиране на корема; Пристягане на талията; Друго
pt-PT: Característica de modelagem: Antifricção; Cós que não enrola; Efeito push-up nos glúteos; Enchimento nas ancas; Forro à prova de fugas; Apoio pós-parto; Adelgaçante nas coxas; Controlo do abdómen; Aperto na cintura; Outro
nb: Forbedringsfunksjon for formtøy: Antignag; Anti-rull-linning; Rumpeløft; Hoftepolstring; Lekkasjesikkert fôr; Støtte etter fødsel; Lårslankende; Magekontroll; Midjeforming; Annet
fr: Fonction principale du vêtement gainant: Anti-frottement; Bande de taille anti-enroulement; Remonte-fesses; Rembourrage des hanches; Doublure anti-fuite; Soutien post-partum; Amincissement des cuisses; Contrôle du ventre; Cintrage de la taille; Autre
zh-TW: 塑身衣增強功能: 防摩擦; 防捲腰頭; 提臀; 豐臀墊; 防漏內襯; 產後托腹; 瘦大腿; 收腹; 束腰; 其他
sv: Formgivande egenskaper för shapewear: Motverkar skav; Rullfri linning; Rumplyft; Höftvaddering; Läckagesäkert foder; Postpartum-stöd; Lårslimmande; Magkontroll; Midjeformande; Övrigt
nl: Shapewear verbeteringskenmerk: Tegen schuren; Antikrul-tailleband; Billenlift; Heup-padding; Lekvrije voering; Postpartum-ondersteuning; Bovenbeen-afslankend; Buikcorrectie; Taille-corrigerend; Overig
it: Funzione di miglioramento dell'intimo modellante: Antisfregamento; Fascia in vita antiarrotolamento; Effetto push-up glutei; Imbottitura fianchi; Fodera a prova di perdite; Supporto post-parto; Snellente per cosce; Contenitivo per addome; Modellante per punto vita; Altro
tr: Vücut şekillendirici geliştirme özelliği: Sürtünme önleyici; Kıvrılma önleyici bel bandı; Kalça kaldırıcı; Kalça dolgusu; Sızdırmaz astar; Doğum sonrası destek; Uyluk inceltici; Karın toparlayıcı; Bel inceltici; Diğer
ru: Функция корректирующего эффекта: Защита от натирания; Пояс с защитой от скручивания; Подтяжка ягодиц; Накладки на бедра; Непротекаемая подкладка; Послеродовая поддержка; Утяжка бедер; Утяжка живота; Утяжка талии; Другое
en: Shapewear enhancement feature: Anti-chafing; Anti-roll waistband; Butt lift; Hip padding; Leakproof lining; Postpartum support; Thigh slimming; Tummy control; Waist cinching; Other